src/adv_myv-lex.txt
LEXICON ADV

! Spatials
тев+Deict+Adv+Spat+Lat+Use/Sub/Dial:тев Clitic ;
тезэ+Deict+Adv+Ill:тезэ Clitic ;
тезэнь+Deict+Adv+Ill:тезэнь Clitic ;
тей+Deict+Adv+Spat+Lat:тей Clitic ;
тей-тов+Deict+Distr+Adv+Spat+Lat:тей-тов # ;
теске+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ine:теске kudo-N ;
теск+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ill+DimK:теск # ;
тесэ+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ine:тесэ kudo-N ;
тестэ+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ela:тестэ kudo-N ;
тия+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:тия kudo-N ;
тияк+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol+DimK:тияк lak-N ;
тияко+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol+DimKO:тияко kudo-N ;
тияня+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:тияня kudo-N ;
тия-тува+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:тия-тува kudo-N ;
тува+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:тува kudo-N ;
туваня+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:туваня kudo-N ;
тувако+Deict+Adv+Spat+Prol:тувако kudo-N ;
тов+Deict+Adv+Spat+Lat:тов Clitic ;
тозо+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ill+Use/Sub/Dial:тозо Clitic ;
тозонь+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ill:тозонь Clitic ;
тоско+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ine+DimKO:тоско kudo-N ;
тоск+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ill+DimK:тоск # ;
тосо+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ine:тосо kudo-N ;
тосто+Deict+Adv+Spat+Ela:тосто kudo-N ;


! Temporals
сёксня+Adv+Temp:сёксня Gen-Attributes ;
тедиде+Deict+Adv+Temp+Use/Sub/Phon:тедеде kudo-N ;
тедиде+Deict+Adv+Temp:тедиде kudo-N ;
течи+Deict+Adv+Temp:течи kudo-N ;
течи+Deict+Adv+Temp+Use/Sub/Dial:тече kudo-N ;
течике+Deict+Adv+Temp:течике kudo-N ;
течимс+Deict+Adv+Ill:течимс Clitic ;
тунда+Adv+Temp:тунда Gen-Attributes ;
улкоть+Adv+Temp:улкоть Gen-Attributes ;
улко+Adv+Temp:улко kudo-N ;
умок+Adv+Temp:умок lak-N ;
умонь+Adv+Temp+Gen:умонь # ;
уш+Adv+Temp:уш kal-N ;
шкань-шкань+Distr+Gen+Adv+Temp:шкань-шкань # ;
шкат-шкат+Distr+Pl+Adv+Temp:шкат-шкат # ;
ялго+Adv:ялго kudo-N ;
